Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-734.03
Immunity from civil liability.

An employer that complies with an income withholding order issued in another state in accordance with sections 42-734 to 42-735 is not subject to civil liability to any individual or agency with regard to the employer's withholding of child support from the obligor's income.

Laws 1997, LB 727, § 13;

Laws 2015, LB415, § 30.